Utah statutes.
73-18b-2.   Filing and publishing regulations.

A copy of the regulations adopted pursuant to this act and any amendments thereto shall be filed in the office of the commission and with the Division of Archives and shall be published in a convenient form.



Amended by Chapter 67, 1984 General Session

